numbers.lexc
Definitions
	Dig = %0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ;
	Int = Dig+ ;
	Dig3 = Dig^3 ;
	IntEng = Dig^{1,3} [ %, Dig3 ]+ ;
	IntEur = Dig^{1,3} [ %. Dig3 ]+ ;
	Eng3Groups = Dig^{1,3} [ %, Dig3 ]* ;
	Eur3Groups = Dig^{1,3} [ %. Dig3 ]* ;
	FloatEng = [ Eng3Groups | Int ] %. Int ;
	FloatEur = [ Eng3Groups | Int ] %, Int ;
	GenDigit = $[Dig] - [Int | IntEng |
		IntEur | FloatEng | FloatEur ] ;
	RedID = 8 Dig^8 ;
	PhoneNumber = Dig^8;
	SocialSecurty = Dig^9;
	
	
LEXICON Root
< FloatEng [ %+Float %+Eng .x. 0 ] >           # ;
< FloatEur [ %+Float %+Eur .x. 0 ] >           # ;
< IntEng [ %+Int %+Eng .x. 0 ] >	           # ;
< IntEur [ %+Int %+Eur .x. 0 ] >	           # ;
< Int %+Int:0 >						           # ;
< GenDigit %+Dig:0 >				           # ;
< PhoneNumber (%+Dig3) %+Dig3 - %Dig^4 >       # ;
< Social Security %+Dig3 - %+Dig^2 - %Dig ^4 > # ;
